Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 9 FOSTER CARE, RESIDENTIAL, DAY TREATMENT, AND CHILD PLACEMENT AGENCY LICENSING
26-6-912. Investigations and inspections - local authority - reports - rules.

The state department shall investigate and pass on each application for issuance of a license, each application for a permanent or time-limited license following the issuance of a probationary or provisional license, and each application for renewal of a license to operate a facility or an agency prior to granting the license or renewal. As part of the investigation, the state department shall require each individual, including but not limited to the applicant, an owner, an employee, a newly hired employee, a licensee, and an adult who is eighteen years of age or older and resides in the licensed facility, to obtain a fingerprint-based criminal history record check by reviewing any record that is used to assist the state department in ascertaining whether the person being investigated has been convicted of any of the criminal offenses specified in section 26-6-905 (8) or any other felony. The state board shall promulgate rules that define and identify what the criminal history record check entails.

Rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to this subsection (1)(a)(I) must require the fingerprint-based criminal history record check in all circumstances, other than those identified in subsection (1)(a)(I)(C) of this section, to include a fingerprint-based criminal history record check using the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation and to apply to any new owner, new applicant, newly hired employee, new licensee, or individual who begins residing in the licensed facility. As part of the investigation, the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the state department must be accessed to determine whether the owner, applicant, employee, newly hired employee, licensee, or individual who resides in the licensed facility being investigated has been found to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect. Information is made available pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(j) and rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to section 19-3-313.5 (4). Except as provided in subsection (1)(a)(I)(C) of this section, any change in ownership of a licensed facility or agency or addition of a new resident adult or newly hired employee to the licensed facility requires a new investigation as provided in this section.

When two or more individually licensed facilities are wholly owned, operated, and controlled by a common ownership group or school district, a fingerprint-based criminal history record check and a check of the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the department, completed for one of the licensed facilities of the common ownership group or school district pursuant to this section for an individual for whom the check is required pursuant to this part 9, may satisfy the record check requirement for any other licensed facility under the same common ownership group or school district. A new fingerprint-based criminal history record check or new check of the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the department is not required of such an individual if the common ownership group or school district maintains a central records management system for employees of all its licensed facilities; takes action as required pursuant to section 26-6-905 when informed of the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check or check of the records and reports of child abuse or neglect maintained by the department that requires action pursuant to this part 9; and informs the department whenever an additional licensed facility comes under or is no longer under its ownership or control.

The state board shall promulgate rules to implement this subsection (1)(a)(I).

A comparison search on the ICON system at the state judicial department with the name and date of birth information and any other available source of criminal history information that the state department determines is appropriate for each circumstance in which the Colorado bureau of investigation fingerprint check either does not confirm a criminal history or confirms a criminal history, in order to determine the crime or crimes for which the person was arrested or convicted and the disposition thereof;

Any other recognized database that is accessible on a statewide basis as set forth by rules promulgated by the state board; and

When the results of an investigation performed pursuant to subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section or this subsection (1)(a)(II) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

An applicant for certification as a foster care home shall provide the child placement agency or the county department from whom the certification is sought with a list of all the prior child placement agencies and county departments to which the applicant has previously applied, and a release of information from the child placement agencies and county departments to which the applicant has previously applied, to obtain information about the application and any certification given by the child placement agencies and county departments. A child placement agency or county department from whom the certification is sought shall conduct a reference check of the applicant and any adult resident of the foster care home by contacting all of the child placement agencies and county departments identified by the applicant before issuing the certification for that foster care home. Child placement agencies and county departments are held harmless for information released, in good faith, to other child placement agencies or county departments.

For all applicants applying to be a foster care home or kinship foster care home, regardless of reimbursement, the county department or child placement agency shall require each adult who is eighteen years of age or older and who resides in the home to obtain a fingerprint-based criminal history record check through the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The applicant must provide the county department or child placement agency with the addresses where the applicant and any adult residing in the home have lived in the preceding five years, including addresses from other states. The county department or the child placement agency shall conduct the following background checks of the applicant or an adult residing in the home:

A fingerprint-based criminal history record check to determine if the applicant or adult residing in the home has been convicted of any of the crimes listed in section 26-6-910 (5)(a);

A check of the ICON system at the state judicial department to determine the status or disposition of any pending criminal charges brought against the applicant or adult who resides in the home that were identified by the fingerprint-based criminal history record check through the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation;

A check of the state department's automated database for information to determine if the applicant or adult who resides in the home has been identified as having a finding of child abuse or neglect and whether the finding has been determined to present an unsafe placement for a child;

A check against the state's sex offender registry and against the national sex offender public registry operated by the United States department of justice that checks names and addresses in the registries and the interactive database system for Colorado to determine if the applicant or adult who resides in the home is a registered sex offender; and

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check performed pursuant to this subsection (1)(c)(I) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, a name-based criminal history record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

In addition to the fingerprint-based criminal history record check, the county department or child placement agency shall contact the appropriate entity in each state in which the applicant or any adult residing in the home has resided within the preceding five years to determine whether the individual has been found to be responsible in a confirmed report of child abuse or neglect.

The screening request in Colorado for criminal history record checks through the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation must be made pursuant to section 19-1-307 (2)(k.5), rules promulgated by the state board pursuant to section 19-3-313.5, and 42 U.S.C. sec. 671 (a)(20).

The department must conduct an investigation pursuant to this subsection (1)(c) for any new resident adult whenever the adult is added to the foster care home or kinship care home. The department shall not use information obtained from state records of abuse or neglect for any purpose other than conducting the investigation for placement or certification.

When the state department, county department, or child placement agency is able to certify that the applicant or licensee is competent and will operate adequate facilities to care for children pursuant to the requirements of this part 9 and that standards are being met and will be complied with, it shall issue the license for which the applicant or licensee applied. The state department shall inspect or cause to be inspected the facilities to be operated by an applicant for an original license before the license is granted and shall thereafter inspect or cause to be inspected the facilities of all licensees that, during the period of licensure, have been found to be the subject of complaints or to be out of compliance with the standards set forth in section 26-6-909 and the rules of the state department, or that otherwise appear to be placing children at risk. The state department may make such other inspections as it deems necessary to ensure that the requirements of this part 9 are being met and that the health, safety, and welfare of the children being placed are protected. If, as a result of an inspection of a certified foster care home, the state department determines that a child residing in the foster care home is subject to an immediate and direct threat to the child's safety and welfare as defined by rules promulgated by the state board or that a substantial violation of a fundamental standard of care warrants immediate action, the state department may require a county department to immediately remove the child from the foster care home.

The state board shall adopt rules concerning the on-site public availability of the most recent inspection report results of facilities, when requested. The state board shall also adopt rules concerning a requirement that all facilities licensed pursuant to this part 9 post their licenses and information regarding the procedures for filing a complaint pursuant to this part 9 directly with the state department, which rules must require that each facility display its license and complaint procedures in a prominent and conspicuous location at all times during operational hours of the facility; except that the rules must not require foster care homes to post their licenses and the rules must not require foster care homes and child placement agencies to post information regarding the procedures for filing a complaint pursuant to this part 9 directly with the state department. The state board shall adopt rules requiring foster care homes to make their licenses available to their patrons for inspection, upon request, and requiring foster care homes and child placement agencies to make the information concerning the filing of complaints available to their patrons for inspection, upon request.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part 9 to the contrary, the state department may enter into an interagency agreement or a memorandum of understanding, or both, as necessary to complete the criminal history record checks and other background checks required in this section.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(a)(II) of this section, the state department may authorize or contract with a county department, the county department of health, or another publicly or privately operated organization that has a declared interest in children and experience working with children or on behalf of children to investigate and inspect the facilities applying for an original or renewal license or applying for a permanent license following the issuance of a probationary or provisional license pursuant to this part 9 and may accept reports on the investigations and inspections from the agencies or organizations as a basis for licensing. When contracting for investigations and inspections, the state department shall ensure that the contractor is qualified by training and experience and has no conflict of interest with respect to the facilities to be inspected.
(2) (a) (I) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(a)(II) of this section, the state department may authorize or contract with a county department, the county department of health, or another publicly or privately operated organization that has a declared interest in children and experience working with children or on behalf of children to investigate and inspect the facilities applying for an original or renewal license or applying for a permanent license following the issuance of a probationary or provisional license pursuant to this part 9 and may accept reports on the investigations and inspections from the agencies or organizations as a basis for licensing. When contracting for investigations and inspections, the state department shall ensure that the contractor is qualified by training and experience and has no conflict of interest with respect to the facilities to be inspected.

The state department shall not authorize or contract with a county department, the county department of health, or another publicly or privately operated organization that has a declared interest in children and experience working with children or on behalf of children for investigations and inspections described in subsection (2)(a)(I) of this section of any facilities that provide twenty-four-hour care and are licensed pursuant to this part 9.

A city, county, or city and county may impose and enforce higher standards and requirements for facilities licensed pursuant to this part 9 than the standards and requirements specified pursuant to this part 9.

Every facility and agency licensed pursuant to this part 9 shall keep and maintain such records as the department may prescribe pertaining to the admission, progress, health, and discharge of children under the care of the facility or agency and shall report relative thereto to the department whenever called for, upon forms prescribed by the department. Both the facility or agency and the department shall keep confidential all records regarding children and all facts learned about children and their relatives.

Within available appropriations, the state department shall monitor, on at least a quarterly basis, the county department certification of foster care homes.

As described in section 19-3.3-103, the state department and the office of the child protection ombudsman shall coordinate site visits to investigate and review residential child care facilities that house unaccompanied immigrant children who are in the custody of the office of refugee resettlement in the federal department of health and human services as set forth in 8 U.S.C. sec. 1232 et seq. The state department and the office of the child protection ombudsman may share final reports based on their site visits.

When the state department receives a serious complaint about a facility or agency licensed pursuant to this part 9 alleging the immediate risk to the health or safety of the children cared for in the facility, the state department shall respond to the complaint and conduct an on-site investigation concerning the complaint within forty-eight hours after its receipt.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 811, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-913. Revocation of certification of foster care home - emergency procedures - due process.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a county department may act immediately to revoke the certification of a county-certified foster care home when the county department has reason to believe that a child residing in the foster care home is subject to an immediate and direct threat to the child's safety and welfare or when a substantial violation of a fundamental standard of care warrants immediate action. If the county department acts pursuant to this section, a due process hearing shall be held within five days after the action and conducted as the hearing would normally be conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 816, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-914. Denial of license - suspension - revocation - probation - refusal to renew license - fines - definitions.

When the department has denied an application for a license, the department shall notify the applicant in writing of the denial by mailing a notice to the applicant at the address shown on the application. An applicant who is aggrieved by the denial may pursue the remedy for review as provided in subsection (10) of this section if the applicant, within thirty days after receiving the notice, petitions the department to set a date and place for hearing, affording the applicant an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. All hearings on the denial of licenses shall be conducted in conformity with the provisions and procedures specified in article 4 of title 24, as in the case of the suspension and revocation of licenses.

The department may deny an application, or suspend, revoke, or make probationary the license, of any facility or agency regulated and licensed pursuant to this part 9 or assess a fine against the licensee pursuant to section 26-6-921 if the licensee, an affiliate of the licensee, a person employed by the licensee, or a person who resides with the licensee at the facility or agency:

Is convicted of a felony, other than those offenses specified in section 26-6-905 (8), or child abuse, as specified in section 18-6-401, the record of conviction being conclusive evidence thereof, notwithstanding section 24-5-101, or have entered into a deferred judgment agreement or a deferred prosecution agreement to a felony, other than those offenses specified in section 26-6-905 (8), or child abuse, as specified in section 18-6-401, or if the department has a certified court order from another state indicating that the applicant, licensee, person employed by the licensee, or any person residing with the licensee has been convicted of a felony, other than those offenses specified in section 26-6-905 (8), under a law of another state or of the United States or has entered into a deferred judgment agreement or a deferred prosecution agreement in another state as to a felony, other than those offenses specified in section 26-6-905 (8); or

Is convicted of third degree assault, as described in section 18-3-204; any misdemeanor, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court on the record to include an act of domestic violence, as defined in section 18-6-800.3; the violation of a protection order, as described in section 18-6-803.5; any misdemeanor offense of child abuse, as defined in section 18-6-401; or any misdemeanor offense in another state, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any one of the offenses described in this subsection (2)(b). As used in this subsection (2)(b), "convicted" has the same meaning as set forth in section 26-6-905 (8)(a)(II).

Is determined to be insane or mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and, a court has entered, pursuant to part 3 or part 4 of article 14 of title 15, or section 27-65-109 (4) or 27-65-127, an order specifically finding that the mental incompetency or insanity is of such a degree that the licensee is incapable of operating a facility or agency, the record of such determination and entry of such order being conclusive evidence thereof; or

Uses any controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), including retail marijuana, or consumes any alcoholic beverage during the operating hours of the facility or agency or is under the influence of a controlled substance or alcoholic beverage during the operating hours of the facility or agency; or

Is convicted of unlawful use of a controlled substance as specified in section 18-18-404; unlawful distribution, manufacturing, dispensing, sale, or possession of a controlled substance as specified in section 18-18-403.5 or 18-18-405; or unlawful offenses relating to marijuana or marijuana concentrate as specified in section 18-18-406; or

Consistently fails to maintain standards prescribed and published by the department; or

Furnishes or makes any misleading or any false statement or report to the department; or

Refuses to submit to the department any reports or refuses to make available to the department any records required by it in making investigation of the facility or agency for licensing purposes; or

Fails or refuses to submit to an investigation or inspection by the department or to admit authorized representatives of the department at any reasonable time for the purpose of investigation or inspection; or

Fails to provide, maintain, equip, and keep in safe and sanitary condition premises established or used for child care pursuant to standards prescribed by the department of public health and environment and the department of human services or by ordinances or regulations applicable to the location of such facility; or

Willfully or deliberately violates any of the provisions of this part 9 or any of the standards prescribed and published in department rule pursuant to this part 9; or

Fails to maintain financial resources adequate for the satisfactory care of children served in regard to upkeep of premises and provision for personal care, medical services, clothing, and other essentials in the proper care of children; or

Is charged with the commission of an act of child abuse or an unlawful sexual offense, as specified in section 18-3-411 (1), if:

The individual has admitted committing the act or offense and the admission is documented or uncontroverted; or

The administrative law judge finds that the charge is supported by substantial evidence; or

Admits to an act of child abuse or if substantial evidence is found that the licensee, person employed by the licensee, or person who resides with the licensee in the licensed facility or agency has committed an act of child abuse. As used in this subsection (2)(n), "child abuse" has the same meaning as that ascribed to the term "abuse" or "child abuse or neglect" in section 19-1-103 (1).

Is the subject of a negative licensing action; or

Misuses any public funds that are provided to a foster care home, or child placement agency that places or arranges for placement of a child in foster care, for the purposes of providing foster care services, child placement services related to the provision of foster care, or any administrative costs related to the provision of foster care services or foster-care-related child placement services. The state board shall promulgate rules defining the term "misuse", which rules must take into account similar definitions in federal law and may include references to relevant circulars of the federal office of management and budget.

The state department may deny an application to renew a license based on the grounds set forth in subsection (2) of this section. The denial is effective upon the expiration of the existing license. The existing license does not continue in effect even though the applicant for renewal files a request for hearing or appeal.

The state department may deny an application for a facility or agency license pursuant to this part 9 if the applicant is a relative affiliate of a licensee of a facility or agency licensed pursuant to this part 9, which licensee is the subject of a previous negative licensing action or is the subject of a pending investigation by the state department that may result in a negative licensing action.

The state department may deny an application for a child placement agency license pursuant to this part 9 if the applicant is a relative affiliate of a licensee of a child placement agency licensed pursuant to this part 9, which licensee is the subject of a previous negative licensing action or is the subject of a pending investigation by the state department that may result in a negative licensing action.

The state department shall deny an application for a license under the circumstances described in section 26-6-905 (8). The state department shall revoke or suspend a license previously issued if:
(6) (a) (I) The state department shall deny an application for a license under the circumstances described in section 26-6-905 (8). The state department shall revoke or suspend a license previously issued if:

The licensee, person employed by the licensee, or person residing with the licensee is thereafter convicted, or if it is later discovered that the licensee, person employed by the licensee, or person residing with the licensee had previously been convicted, of any of the criminal offenses set forth in section 26-6-905 (8); or

The department has a certified court order from another state indicating that the licensee, person employed by the licensee, or person residing with the licensee is thereafter convicted of, or if it is later discovered that the licensee, person employed by the licensee, or person residing with the licensee had previously been convicted of, a criminal offense under a law of another state or of the United States that is similar to any of the criminal offenses set forth in section 26-6-905 (8); or

The licensee, an affiliate of the licensee, a person employed by the licensee, or a person who resides with the licensee at the facility or agency has been determined to be insane or mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction and a court has entered, pursuant to part 3 or part 4 of article 14 of title 15, or section 27-65-109 (4) or 27-65-127, an order specifically finding that the mental incompetency or insanity is of such a degree that the licensee is incapable of operating a facility or agency, the record of such determination and entry of such order being conclusive evidence thereof.

As used in this subsection (6)(a), "convicted" means a conviction by a jury or by a court and also includes a deferred judgment and sentence agreement, a deferred prosecution agreement, a deferred adjudication agreement, an adjudication, and a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.

A certified copy of the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction of a conviction, deferred judgment and sentence agreement, deferred prosecution agreement, or deferred adjudication agreement, or a certified court order from another state indicating an agreement from another state, is prima facie evidence of the conviction or agreement.

The state department shall deny an application for a facility or agency licensed pursuant to this part 9 and shall revoke the license of a facility or agency licensed pursuant to this part 9 if the facility or agency cultivates marijuana pursuant to the authority in section 16 of article XVIII of the state constitution.

The department may assess fines, pursuant to the provisions of section 26-6-921, against a licensee or a person employed by the licensee who willfully and deliberately or consistently violates the standards prescribed and published by the department or the provisions of this part 9.

The department shall determine the convictions identified in this section according to the records of the Colorado bureau of investigation, the ICON system at the state judicial department, or any other source, as set forth in section 26-6-912 (1)(a)(II).

The department shall suspend or revoke a license only in conformity with the provisions and procedures specified in article 4 of title 24, and after a hearing thereon as provided in said article 4; except that all hearings under this part 9 must be conducted by an administrative law judge of the department, who shall render a recommendation to the executive director of the department, who shall render the final decision of the department, and no licensee is entitled to a right to cure any of the charges described in subsection (2)(a), (2)(c), (2)(d), or (2)(m)(I) of this section. The hearing shall not prevent or delay any injunctive proceedings instituted pursuant to the provisions of section 26-6-918.

The provisions of subsection (2)(d) of this section do not apply to foster care homes, unless such use or consumption impairs the licensee's ability to properly care for children.

A child placement agency licensed pursuant to this part 9 that places or arranges for placement of a child in foster care may certify the home of a relative of the child placed therein as a foster care home only upon the request of a county department.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 817, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-915. Notice of negative licensing action - filing of complaints.

When a facility or agency licensed pursuant to this part 9 has been notified by the department of a negative licensing action or the imposition of a fine pursuant to section 26-6-914 (2) and (8), it shall, within ten days after receiving the notice, provide the department with the names and mailing addresses of the parents or legal guardians of each child cared for at the facility or agency. The department shall maintain the confidentiality of the names and mailing addresses provided to it pursuant to this subsection (1).

Within twenty days after receiving the names and addresses of parents and legal guardians pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of this section, the department shall send a written notice to each such parent or legal guardian identifying the negative licensing action or the fine imposed and providing a description of the basis for the action as it relates to the impact on the health, safety, and welfare of the children in the care of the facility or agency. The department shall send the notice to the parents and legal guardians by first-class mail.

The state board shall promulgate rules concerning the assessment of a fine against a licensee that is equal to the direct and indirect costs associated with the mailing of the notice described in subsection (1)(b) of this section.

This subsection (1) does not preclude the state department or a county department from notifying parents or legal guardians of serious violations of any of the standards prescribed and published by the department or any of the provisions of this part 9 that could impact the health, safety, or welfare of a child cared for at the facility or home.

The state board shall promulgate rules requiring facilities and agencies to provide written notice to the parents and legal guardians of the children cared for in the facilities and agencies of the procedures by which to file a complaint against the facility or agency or an employee of the facility or agency with the division within the department that is responsible for facility and agency licensing. The rules must specify the information that the notice must contain and must require that the notice include the current mailing address and telephone number of the division within the department that is responsible for facility and agency licensing.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 821, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-916. Institutes.

The department may hold institutes and programs for licensees under this part 9 to assist in the improvement of standards and practices of facilities operated and maintained by licensees and in the more efficient and practical administration and enforcement of this part 9. In conducting the institutes and programs, the department may request the assistance of health, education, and fire safety officials.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 822, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-917. Acceptance of federal grants.

The department is authorized to accept, on behalf of the state, any grants of federal funds made available for any purposes consistent with the provisions of this part 9. The executive director of the department, with the approval of the governor, has the power to direct the disposition of any grants so accepted in conformity with the terms and conditions under which they are given.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 822, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-918. Injunctive proceedings.

The department, in the name of the people of the state of Colorado, through the attorney general of the state, must apply for an injunction in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin a person from operating a facility or agency without a license that is required to be licensed pursuant to this part 9. If the person does not have a valid license pursuant to this part 9, the person's license has been revoked pursuant to section 26-6-914, or the person does not meet the licensing exemption criteria set forth in section 26-6-904, yet provides child care and has a pattern of providing the child care without a valid license as required by this part 9, and despite having received notification from the department that the person, facility, or agency is in violation of the law, then the person, facility, or agency is providing unlicensed and illegal child care. At the time the department applies for an injunction, the department shall notify law enforcement of the injunction proceedings. If it is established that the defendant has been or is operating the facility or agency without a valid license, the court shall enter a decree enjoining the defendant from further operating the facility unless and until the person obtains a license as required by this part 9. In case of a violation of an injunction issued pursuant to this section, the court may summarily try and punish the offender for contempt of court. Injunctive proceedings pursuant to this section are in addition to and not in lieu of the penalty provided in section 26-6-919.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 822, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-919. Penalty.

On or after July 1, 2021, a person violating any provision of this part 9, intentionally making a false statement or report to the department or to an agency delegated by the department to make an investigation or inspection pursuant to the provisions of this part 9, or violating a cease-and-desist order that is not cured is guilty of a petty offense and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of up to five hundred dollars, a sentence of up to ten days in jail, or both.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 822, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-920. Periodic review of licensing regulations and procedures.

At least every five years, the department shall conduct a comprehensive review of the licensing rules for foster care homes and child placement agencies and the procedures relating to and governing foster care homes and agencies, including procedures for the review of backgrounds of employees and owners. In conducting the periodic review, the department shall consult with foster care providers, child placement agencies, county departments, the department of public health and environment, and other interested parties throughout the state. The periodic review must include an examination of the rules applicable to foster care homes and child placement agencies; the process of licensing foster care homes and child placement agencies; uniformity of standards or lack thereof in the licensing process; statewide standardization of investigations and enforcement of licensing by the department; duplication and conflicts in rules, requirements, or procedures between the department and the department of public health and environment; and recommendations for streamlining and unifying the licensing process. The review must also include an examination of rules and procedures regarding the general physical and mental health of foster care providers, employees, and owners. At the conclusion of each review, the department shall report its findings and conclusions and its recommendations for administrative changes and for legislation to the state board.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 823, § 17, effective July 1.

26-6-921. Civil penalties - fines - child welfare cash fund - created.

In addition to any other penalty otherwise provided by law, including section 26-6-919, a person who violates any provision of this part 9 or intentionally makes a false statement or report to the department or to any agency delegated by the department to make an investigation or inspection pursuant to the provisions of this part 9 may be assessed a civil penalty up to a maximum of ten thousand dollars, as follows:

Two hundred and fifty dollars a day for the first day;

Five hundred dollars a day for the second day; and

One thousand dollars a day for the third and subsequent days.

Each day in which a person is in violation of any provision of this part 9 may constitute a separate offense.

The department may assess a civil penalty in conformity with the provisions and procedures specified in article 4 of title 24; except that all hearings conducted pursuant to this section must be before an administrative law judge of the department, who shall render a recommendation to the executive director of the department, who shall render the final decision of the department.

The department shall transmit fines collected pursuant to this section, section 26-6-914 (2) and (8), and section 26-6-915 (1)(c) to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the child welfare cash fund, created in subsection (4)(b) of this section.

The balance as of July 1, 2022, in the child care cash fund, created pursuant to section 26-6-114 (5), as it existed prior to July 1, 2022, that is attributable to fines and civil penalties collected by the division in the department that is responsible for child welfare is hereby transferred to the child welfare cash fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury. The treasurer shall credit all interest derived from the deposit and investment of money in the child welfare cash fund to the fund. At the end of a fiscal year, all unexpended and unencumbered money in the child welfare cash fund remains in the fund and is not credited or transferred to the general fund or any other fund. Money in the child welfare cash fund is continuously appropriated to the department to fund activities related to the improvement of the quality of child care in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire part added, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 823, § 17, effective July 1.